Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3563
Hospital districts; bonds; taxes.

Taxes for the payment of the hospital district bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied in the manner provided by section 23-3565.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 10, p. 354;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.58;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 22.